Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1417
Disclosure.

(1) The landlord or any person authorized to enter into a rental agreement on his or her behalf shall disclose to the tenant in writing at or before the commencement of the tenancy the name and address of:

(a) The person authorized to manage the premises; and

(b) An owner of the premises or a person authorized to act for and on behalf of the owner for the purpose of service of process and for the purpose of receiving and receipting for notices and demands.

(2) The information required to be furnished by this section shall be kept current and this section extends to and is enforceable against any successor landlord, owner, or manager.

(3) A person who fails to comply with subsection (1) of this section becomes an agent of each person who is a landlord for the purpose of:

(a) Service of process and receiving and receipting for notices and demands; and

(b) Performing the obligations of the landlord under the Uniform Residential Landlord and Tenant Act and under the rental agreement and expending or making available for the purpose all rent collected from the premises.

Laws 1974, LB 293, § 17;

Laws 2001, LB 7, § 13.